North Carolina, session 2025, HB224.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143C-9-7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143C-9-7. Indian Gaming Education Revenue Fund.
(a) The "Indian Gaming Education Revenue Fund" is established in the State Treasury.
Funds shall be expended from the Indian Gaming Education Revenue Fund only by specific
appropriation by the General Assembly.
(b) Upon Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, upon appropriation by the
General Assembly, funds received in the Indian Gaming Education Revenue Fund shall be
allocated quarterly by the State Board of Education to local school administrative units, charter
schools, and regional schools on the basis of allotted average daily membership. The funds
allotted by the State Board of Education pursuant to this section shall be nonreverting. Funds
received pursuant to this section by local school administrative units in this State shall be
expended for the sole purpose of educating children in the classroom.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, upon appropriation by the
General Assembly, funds received in the Indian Gaming Fund shall be allocated quarterly to the
North Carolina State Commission of Indian Affairs, the non-gaming Indian tribes recognized by
the State in Chapter 71A of the General Statutes, and the four Urban Indian Organizations that
are members of the North Carolina Commission of Indian Affairs. Funds received pursuant to
this section by the North Carolina State Commission of Indian Affairs shall be expended for the
Commission's operating expenses and programs. Funds received pursuant to this section by the
non-gaming Tribes and Urban Indian Organizations shall be expended to support cultural and
economic development."
SECTION 2.(a) There is appropriated from the Indian Gaming Fund, as renamed in
Section 1 of this act, to the Department of Administration, North Carolina State Commission of
Indian Affairs, the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in recurring funds for each year of
the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for the Commission's operating expenses and programs.
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the Indian Gaming Fund, as renamed in
Section 1 of this act, to the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of five million two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($5,250,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027
fiscal biennium to provide directed grants to the seven non-gaming Indian tribes to be used for
*H224-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
cultural, educational, and economic development. These funds shall be divided equally among
the following:
(1) The Coharie of Sampson and Harnett Counties.
(2) The Haliwa-Saponi of Halifax, Warren, and adjoining counties.
(3) The Lumbee of Robeson, Hoke, and Scotland Counties.
(4) The Meherrin of Hertford, Bertie, Northampton, and Gates Counties.
(5) The Waccamaw-Siouan from Columbus and Bladen Counties.
(6) The Sappony of Person County.
(7) The Occaneechi Band of the Saponi Nation of Orange and surrounding
counties.
SECTION 2.(c) There is appropriated from the Indian Gaming Fund, as renamed in
Section 1 of this act, to the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of four hundred
thousand dollars ($400,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to
provide directed grants to the four Urban Indian Organizations to be used for cultural,
educational, and economic development. These funds shall be divided equally among the
following:
(1) The Cumberland County Association for Indian People of Cumberland
County.
(2) The Guilford Native Americans Association of Guilford and surrounding
counties.
(3) The Metrolina Native Americans Association of Mecklenburg and
surrounding counties.
(4) The Triangle Native American Society of Wake and surrounding counties.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the Indian Gaming Fund, as renamed in
Section 1 of this act, the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in recurring funds for
each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to support the State Advisory Council on Indian
Education.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the Indian Gaming Fund, as renamed in
Section 1 of this act, to the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of one million one
hundred thousand dollars ($1,100,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to
provide directed grants as follows:
(1) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to the Haliwa-Saponi Tribe,
Incorporated, for operating costs and capital needs of the Haliwa-Saponi
Tribal School.
(2) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to Old Main STREAM Academy,
Inc., for operating costs and capital needs of the Old Main STREAM
Academy.
(3) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to the Waccamaw-Siouan Indian
Tribe, Inc., to support the Waccamaw Siouan Daycare.
SECTION 5. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 224-First Edition